District of Columbia statutes.
38-2732

DC Leveraging Educational Assistance Partnership Program.

The State Education Office shall administer the DC Leveraging Educational Assistance Partnership Program.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 4023, 53 DCR 6899
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4023 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4023 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4023 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).